Hawaii, session 2026, HB1981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a better understanding of the carbon sequestration potential and location and temperature of geothermal and underground water resources across the State can have multiple benefits to agriculture, clean energy, and land use. The legislature further finds that resource characterization via slim-hole bores, which have a diameter of seven inches or less for over ninety per cent of the depth of the bore, can identify geothermal, carbon sequestration, and water resources across the State. The legislature additionally finds that a statewide environmental assessment of a slim-hole exploration program should be conducted, along with robust and continued community engagement, to identify the most appropriate locations for this scientific activity. The purpose of this Act is to require the Hawaii state energy office to implement a slim-hole resource characterization program that identifies the location and characteristics of geothermal, carbon sequestration, and underground water resources across the State in collaboration with the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§196-     Geothermal, carbon sequestration, and underground water resource characterization program.  (a)  There is established the geothermal, carbon sequestration, and underground water resource characterization program within the Hawaii state energy office to identify the location and characteristics of geothermal, carbon sequestration, and underground water resources across the State using the slim-hole boring exploration method.  The Hawaii state energy office shall implement the program in collaboration with the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii or similar institution. (b) Upon finding a geothermal, carbon sequestration, or underground water resource, the Hawaii state energy office shall seek funds to conduct an environmental assessment or environmental impact statement for the program's actions pursuant to chapter 343.  The assessment or impact statement shall be conducted in collaboration with the appropriate state agencies, including the department of land and natural resources and department of health, and shall include input from Native Hawaiian cultural practitioners. (c) Before and during the statewide environmental assessment for the geothermal, carbon sequestration, and underground water resource characterization program activities, the Hawaii state energy office and collaborators shall meet with the counties and nearby communities, including individuals and civic organizations, in order to explain the purpose of the program and identify community needs, priorities, concerns, and appropriate locations to conduct the slim-hole boring for the characterization program. (d)  The Hawaii state energy office shall submit an annual report on the status of geothermal resource identification and development potential in the State, including information about developments in geothermal energy technology, activities in other states or in the counties, and geothermal energy's role in achieving energy self-sufficiency in the State.  The report shall be made available to the public in readily accessible formats, including commonly used mapping software." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the energy security special fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.